src/third_party/hunspell/tests/alias3.aff
# morph. aliases with complex prefixes
COMPLEXPREFIXES
WORDCHARS _

AM 4
AM affix_1/
AM affix_2/
AM /suffix_1
AM [stem_1]

PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 tek . 1

PFX B Y 1
PFX B 0 met/A . 2

SFX C Y 1
SFX C 0 _test_ . 3
